Arkansas statutes. Title 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 9 On-premises Consumption
3-9-217 — 3-9-220. [Reserved.]

(a)

The General Assembly recognizes that:

(1)

Many individuals in this state serve mixed drinks containing alcoholic beverages to their friends and guests in the privacy of their homes and, in addition, that many individuals associated together in private nonprofit corporations established for fraternal, patriotic, recreational, political, social, or other mutual purposes as authorized by law, established not for pecuniary gain, have provided for their mutual convenience and for the preparation and serving to themselves and their guests mixed drinks prepared from alcoholic beverages owned by the members individually or in common under a so-called “locker”, “pool”, or “revolving fund” system;

(2)

Many individuals travel to this state to assemble at regional meetings and conventions to associate with other individuals who are members of professional and social organizations and that:

(A)

Many of the restaurants and entertainment facilities used for the meetings and conventions promote the hospitality of the host communities where the restaurants, convention, and entertainment facilities are located;

(B)

Many of the host organizations plan to serve mixed drinks containing alcoholic beverages to their friends and guests at these meetings and while entertaining and dining during these conventions; and

(C)

Many of the host communities have individuals who have associated together in private nonprofit corporations established for recreational, social, community hospitality, professional association, entertainment, or other mutual purposes established, not for pecuniary gain, but for their mutual convenience and to provide for the preparation and serving to themselves and their guests mixed drinks prepared from alcoholic beverages owned by the members individually or in common under a so-called locker, pool, or revolving fund system; and

(3)(A)(i)

That there are a number of counties or parts of counties where the public retail sale of intoxicating liquors has not been approved by the voters.

(ii)

However, within those counties or parts of counties there are significant developments of tourism facilities and large-event facilities that promote the economic development of the state.

(B)

To ensure that tourism and large-event facilities as well as other associated activities are allowed to exist to promote the economic development in the state, a new hotel or large-event facility private club permit, for use in those places where the public retail sale of intoxicating liquors is not authorized, should be created.

(C)

These permits are necessary so that persons visiting hotels or large-event facilities in these areas will be able to enjoy the amenities that a person might find in other states.

(D)

This additional permit will enhance the experience of going to hotels or large-event facilities that may display items of historic interest, contain extensive art collections, or host musical or dramatic presentations.

(E)(i)

Further, since the counties or parts of counties in which these hotels or large-event facilities will be located do not allow the open public retail sale of intoxicating liquors, the nonprofit corporations that have been established to have the hotel facilities or the large-event facilities should be allowed to offer alcoholic beverages to members of the nonprofit corporations and their guests.

(ii)

These nonprofit corporations have been established for the purpose of operating a qualifying hotel or large-event facility private club or other mutual purposes, not for pecuniary gain, but for their mutual convenience and to provide for the preparation and serving to the members and their guests alcoholic beverages owned by the members individually or in common under a locker, pool, or revolving fund system.

(b)(1)

In order to clarify the alcoholic beverage control laws of this state and to regulate and prohibit the sale of alcoholic beverages in violation of the provisions of this subchapter and other applicable alcoholic beverage control laws of this state, the General Assembly determines that the preparation, mixing, and serving of mixed drinks, beer, and wine for consumption only on the premises of a private club as defined in §3-9-202(14) by the members thereof and their guests and the making of a charge for such services shall not be deemed to be a sale or be in violation of any law of this state prohibiting the manufacture, sale, barter, loan, or giving away of intoxicating liquor whenever:

(A)

The alcoholic beverages, beer, and wine so consumed have been furnished or drawn from private stocks thereof belonging to such members, individually or in common under a so-called locker, pool, or revolving fund system and are replenished only at the expense of such members; and

(B)

The private club has acquired a permit from the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board, in such form as the board may appropriately determine.

(2)(A)

A private club may serve any alcoholic beverage furnished or drawn under the provisions of subdivision (b)(1) of this section on the golf course on which the private club is located when the private club is hosting a professional golf tournament or other charitable golf tournament sponsored by a charitable organization described in 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) and the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division has been notified by the private club at least sixty (60) calendar days prior to the beginning of the event.

(B)

Persons attending the event shall be deemed guests of the private club, and the club may serve the alcoholic beverages to the guests for cash.

(C)

The director may promulgate rules he or she deems necessary to implement this subdivision (b)(2).

(c)

In order to clarify the alcoholic beverage control laws of this state and to regulate and prohibit the sale of alcoholic beverages in violation of the provisions of this subchapter and other applicable alcoholic beverage control laws of this state, the General Assembly determines that the preparation, mixing, and serving of wine and beer for consumption only by the lodging guests on the premises of a bed and breakfast private club as defined in §3-9-202(2) and the making of a charge for such services shall not be deemed to be a sale or to be in violation of any law of this state prohibiting the manufacture, sale, barter, loan, or giving away of intoxicating liquor whenever:

(1)

The wine and beer so consumed have been furnished or drawn from private stocks belonging to an owner of the bed and breakfast private club and are replenished only at the expense of such owner;

(2)

The wine and beer consumed must have been purchased in an Arkansas licensed retail alcoholic beverage store, as authorized by the director;

(3)

The average annual volume of wine and beer consumed shall not exceed three gallons (3 gals.) per month per guest room; and

(4)

The bed and breakfast private club has acquired a permit from the board in such form as the board may appropriately determine.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 132, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-1410; Acts 1999, No. 1063, § 2; 2001, No. 584, § 1; 2003, No. 1813, § 2; 2011, No. 1194, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 101.

Amendments.

The 2003 amendment inserted the subdivision (a)(1) designation; in (a)(1), deleted “associations or” following “nonprofit,” deleted “of” preceding “mixed drinks” and made minor stylistic changes; and added (a)(2).

The 2011 amendment inserted (a)(3).

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (b)(2)(C).

3-9-222. Private clubs — Procedure for obtaining permit.

(a)(1)

Application for a permit to operate as a private club may be made to the governing body of the county or municipality in which the private club seeks to be located.

(2)

If the governing body of the county or municipality approves by ordinance an application for a permit to operate as a private club under subdivision (a)(1) of this section, the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division may issue a permit to operate as a private club to the applicant for the proposed location.

(b)(1)

The application for a private club shall be submitted to the division and accompanied by an annual permit fee of one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500).

(2)

The application for a bed and breakfast private club shall be submitted to the division and accompanied by an annual permit fee of seventy-five dollars ($75.00).

(3)

In an area in which the sale of intoxicating liquor has not been authorized by local option as provided under §3-8-201 et seq., the application for a private club permit shall be submitted to the division and accompanied by an additional application fee of one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500).

(c)(1)

After filing an acceptable application with the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division, the applicant shall cause to be published at least one (1) time each week for four (4) consecutive weeks in a legal newspaper of general circulation in the city in which the premises are situated or, if the premises are not in a city, in a newspaper of general circulation for the locality where the business is to be conducted, a notice that the applicant has applied for a permit to dispense alcoholic beverages on the premises.

(2)

The notice shall be in such form as the director shall prescribe by rule or order and shall be verified.

(3)

The notice shall give the names of the managing agent and the nonprofit corporation or, in the case of a bed and breakfast private club, the name of the business owner, and shall state:

(A)

That the manager, or in the case of a bed and breakfast private club, the owner, at least one (1) partner, or the majority stockholder is a citizen of Arkansas;

(B)

That he or she is of good moral character;

(C)

That he or she has never been convicted of a felony or had a license to sell or dispense alcoholic beverages revoked within the five (5) years preceding the date of the notice; and

(D)

That he or she has never been convicted of violating the laws of this state or of any other state governing the sale or dispensing of alcoholic beverages.

(d)(1)

Within five (5) days after filing an application for a permit to dispense alcoholic beverages on the premises, a notice of the application shall be posted in a conspicuous place at the entrance to the premises.

(2)

The applicant shall notify the director of the date when the notice is first posted.

(3)

No permit shall be issued to any applicant until proper notice has been so posted on the premises for at least thirty (30) consecutive days.

(4)(A)

The notice shall be in such form as the director shall prescribe by rule or order.

(B)

The notice shall be:

(i)

At least eleven inches (11") in width and seventeen inches (17") in height; and

(ii)

Printed in black lettering on a yellow background.

(e)(1)

Upon receipt by the director of an application for a permit, written notice thereof, which shall include a copy of the application, the application shall immediately be mailed by the director to the sheriff, chief of police, if located within a city, prosecuting attorney of the locality in which the premises are situated, and city board of directors or other governing body of the city in which the premises are situated if within an incorporated area. The provisions of this section shall be retroactive to July 28, 1995.

(2)

No license shall be issued by the director until at least thirty (30) days have passed from the mailing by the director of the notices required by this section.

(3)

Upon receipt by the director within the thirty (30) days of a protest against the issuance of a permit by a governing official of the city or county to whom the notice of an application for permit has been mailed, the director shall not issue the license until he or she has held a public hearing.

(f)

Upon the director's determining that the applicant is qualified hereunder and that the application is in the public interest, a permit may be issued as authorized in this section.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 132, § 10; 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1016, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-1410; reen. Acts 1987, No. 949, § 1; 1989, No. 297, § 1; 1997, No. 1010, § 3; 1997, No. 1060, § 3; 1999, No. 1063, § 3; 2007, No. 735, § 3; 2009, No. 294, § 22; 2009, No. 763, § 5; 2017, No. 1112, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a); substituted “four (4)” for “two (2)” in (c)(1); deleted “regulation” following “rule” in (c)(2) and (d)(4)(A); added (d)(4)(B); inserted “the application” preceding “shall” in (e)(1); and made related changes.

The 2009 amendment by No. 294, in (b), substituted “one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500)” for “five hundred dollars ($500)” in (b)(1), and inserted (b)(3).

The 2009 amendment by No. 763 substituted “an area” for “a county” and ”additional application” for “annual permit” in (b)(3).

The 2017 amendment redesignated former (a) as (a)(1); substituted “governing body of the county or municipality in which the private club seeks to be located” for “Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division in accordance with the rules of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board” in (a)(1); added (a)(2); inserted “submitted to the division and” in (b)(1) through (b)(3).

3-9-223. Private clubs — Permit renewal fees — Taxes.

(a)(1)

A permit shall be renewed on or before June 30 of each calendar year for the fiscal year beginning July 1.

(2)

Any permit issued between January and July 1 of any year shall be at one-half (½) of the amount of the fee provided in §3-9-222.

(b)(1)

In addition, there is levied a supplemental tax of ten percent (10%) upon the gross proceeds or gross receipts derived by the private club from the charges to members for the preparation and serving of mixed drinks or for the cooling and serving of beer and wine, drawn from the private stocks of the members as provided in §3-9-221, for consumption only on the premises where served.

(2)

In addition to the tax levied under subdivision (b)(1) of this section, a supplemental tax of four percent (4%) is levied on the gross proceeds or gross receipts derived by the private club from the charges to members for the preparation and serving of mixed drinks drawn from the private stocks of the members as provided in §3-9-221 for consumption only on the premises where served.

(c)(1)

The supplemental tax shall be reported and paid to the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration in the same manner and at the same time as the gross receipts tax under the Arkansas Gross Receipts Act of 1941, §26-52-101 et seq., and shall be in addition to the tax.

(2)(A)

The tax levied under subdivision (b)(2) of this section shall be credited as special revenues to the University of Arkansas Medical Center Fund.

(B)(i)

The funds credited under subdivision (c)(2)(A) of this section shall be used exclusively for making loan repayments for construction projects authorized by Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 261, until the loan is paid in full.

(ii)

After the Chancellor of the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences certifies in writing to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State that the loan has been repaid in full, then revenue from the tax collected under subdivision (b)(2) of this section may be used for any purpose authorized by law.

(d)

The secretary shall promulgate reasonable rules for the enforcement and collection of the tax levied herein, including a requirement that each permittee maintain records showing all such charges made.

(e)

The taxes herein prescribed may be passed on to the members.

(f)(1)

In addition to the fee or supplemental tax as levied herein, any city or incorporated town or any county in which the permitted premises are located, if located outside the limits of a city or incorporated town, may levy an additional permit fee or supplemental tax or both additional permit fee and supplemental tax not to exceed one-half (½) of the amount of the fee or rate provided in this section.

(2)

All fees and taxes levied hereunder by any city or county shall be used for city or county general purposes or for city or county economic development purposes.

(g)

Holders of a bed and breakfast private club permit are exempt from the supplemental taxes in subsections (b) and (f) of this section.

(h)(1)

The Department of Finance and Administration shall notify the city or county of an audit for the supplemental tax on the sale of alcoholic beverages consumed on the premises if:

(A)

The department audits a private club;

(B)

The department makes an assessment related to the audit against the private club; and

(C)

The private club operates in a city or county that imposes a supplemental tax on the sale of alcoholic beverages consumed on the premises under §3-9-223(f).

(2)

The city or county may use this information to administer its supplemental tax on the sale of alcoholic beverages consumed on the premises.

(3)

A city or county provided information under this subsection is subject to all of the confidentiality requirements of §26-18-303.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 132, § 10; 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1016, § 1; 1983, No. 420, § 1; 1983, No. 844, §§ 2, 5; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-313.1, 48-1410, 48-1410n; reen. Acts 1987, No. 949, § 1; 1995, No. 372, § 1; 1995, No. 405, § 1; 1997, No. 546, § 1; 1999, No. 1063, § 4; 2003, No. 335, § 2; 2005, No. 1274, § 2; 2019, No. 315, § 102; 2019, No. 910, §§
3350, 3351.

Amendments.

The 2003 amendment added (h).

The 2005 amendment substituted “ten percent (10%)” for “twelve percent (12%)” in (b)(1); rewrote (b)(2); redesignated former (c) as present (c)(1); and added (c)(2).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (d).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “secretary” for “director” in (c)(1) and (d).

3-9-224. Private clubs — Sales prohibited.

(a)

No private club permitted hereunder shall sell alcoholic beverages either by the package or drink.

(b)

Alcoholic beverages, beer, and wine owned by members may be stored on the premises of the club.

(c)

If any permittee shall sell, barter, loan, or give away any intoxicating liquor in violation of this subchapter or other alcoholic beverage control laws of this state, the permit of the club shall be revoked.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 132, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-1410.

3-9-225. Private clubs — Rules.

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Board is authorized and directed to establish rules with respect to permits issued under the provisions of §3-9-222 to assure compliance with the provisions hereof and to prohibit any permittee from engaging in the unlawful sale of alcoholic beverages.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 132, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-1410; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 103.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “Rules” in the section heading; and deleted “and regulations” following “rules”.

3-9-226. Private clubs — Advertising — Definition.

(a)

As used in this section, “intoxicating liquor” means a beverage containing more than one-half of one percent (0.5%) of alcohol by weight.

(b)

It shall be unlawful for a private club, as defined in §3-9-202, to use the advertising media to promote the consumption and use of alcoholic beverages or to advertise or announce the price of service of alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption in a county where its voters have not authorized the sale of intoxicating liquor in a local option election under Initiated Act No. 1 of 1942, as amended, §§3-8-201 —3-8-203, and3-8-205 —3-8-209.

(c)(1)

A private club, regardless of whether or not the voters in the county authorized the sale of intoxicating liquor in a local option election, shall be entitled to use the advertising media to advertise or announce social functions of general interest, including without limitation:

(A)

A golf tournament;

(B)

A charity ball;

(C)

An entertainment event; or

(D)

A similar activity.

(2)

The social function shall be held within the confines of club property.

(3)

The advertising for the social function shall be preceded by the words “Notice to Members” and the name of the club or organization sponsoring such social activity.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 901, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-955; Acts 2013, No. 527, § 5.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment rewrote the section.

3-9-227. Large attendance facility mixed drink permit.

(a)(1)

There is hereby created a large attendance facility mixed drink permit which is to be issued for any large attendance facility, as defined by §3-9-202(16)(B), in which pari-mutuel wagering has been authorized by law.

(2)

Such permits may only be issued in cities of the first class in which the sale of alcoholic beverages is authorized by law.

(b)(1)

The attendance qualifications for the large attendance facility mixed drink permit are the same as those currently provided for large attendance facilities as set out in §3-9-202(16)(B).

(2)

The annual fee for the large attendance facility mixed drink permit is three thousand dollars ($3,000) per fiscal year.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1247, §§ 1, 2; 2009, No. 294, § 23.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment, in (b), inserted (b)(2), redesignated the remaining text accordingly, deleted “permit fees and” preceding “attendance qualifications” in (b)(1), and made a minor stylistic change.

3-9-228. Private clubs — Reapplication for permit.

(a)

Any person who has applied to the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division for a permit to operate as a private club in an area which has not elected to allow the sale of alcoholic beverages, and that application was denied, may reapply by following the procedures set forth in §3-9-222 and the additional procedures provided for in subsection (b) of this section.

(b)(1)

If the applicant is reapplying within two (2) years from the date an application was denied by the director, the application shall be accompanied by certification from the county clerk of the county where the private club is to be located certifying that the applicant obtained signatures from not less than twenty-five percent (25%) of the registered voters in the county.

(2)

The application shall be filed no later than twenty (20) days from the date that the county clerk certifies the petitions.

(3)

The signatures must be obtained on petitions which clearly state that the purpose of the petitions is to obtain an alcoholic beverage permit for a private club and to serve alcoholic beverages.

(4)

The person obtaining signatures shall verify the signatures by affidavit which is to be filed with the county clerk at the time of filing the petitions for certification.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1212, §§ 1, 2; 2005, No. 1245, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment substituted “two (2)” for “five (5)” in (b)(1).

3-9-229. Collection of taxes.

The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration may assess and collect delinquent state and local taxes from the owner or owners of the hotel or restaurant, file claims for unpaid taxes against bonds or other security required to be posted by the permittee, and enforce liens against assets held by the owner or owners. The Alcoholic Beverage Control Division may suspend or refuse to renew a permit held by a nonpartner if the hotel or restaurant owner fails to remit state taxes.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 222, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 3352.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary” for “Director”.

3-9-230, 3-9-231. [Reserved.]

(a)

No permit shall be issued under this subchapter unless the permittee has consented in writing that the licensed premises and its books and records shall be open at all times to all law enforcement and tax officials and officials of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division, the Alcoholic Beverage Control Enforcement Division, and the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration without requirement of warrant or other legal process.

(b)

No organization holding a permit under this subchapter shall market, sell, or otherwise furnish the names of its members or any other information pertaining to its members to any other public or private entity, except as provided in subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 132, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-1406; Acts 2003, No. 654, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 3353.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary” for “Director” in (a).

3-9-233. Closing hours.

(a)

The rules of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board and existing laws with respect to the closing hours of licensed premises under this subchapter shall be applicable to all such licensed premises in the state, except that:

(1)

The governing body of a city in which hotel and restaurant licensed premises are located may fix by ordinance later closing hours for such hotel and restaurant licensed premises than are prescribed by state law or rules of the board for licensed premises generally. In that case, the closing hours for such hotel and restaurant licensed premises as provided by ordinance of the governing body of the city shall govern with respect to the licensed premises in the city; and

(2)

In any county of this state having a population of not less than fifty-three thousand (53,000) and not more than fifty-eight thousand (58,000) in which hotel and restaurant licensed premises are located outside the corporate limits of any municipality, the county court of the county may fix by order of the court later closing hours for the hotel and restaurant licensed premises than are prescribed by state law or rules of the board for licensed premises generally. In that case, the closing hours for the hotel and restaurant licensed premises located in the county outside of municipal limits shall be governed by the order of the county court.

(b)

However, under no circumstances may any licensed premises remain open more than two (2) hours after 12:00 midnight on Saturday night.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 132, § 12; 1973, No. 387, § 1; 1975, No. 137, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-1412; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 104.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” throughout (a).

3-9-234. Failure to pay renewal fees or taxes.

(a)

If any permittee shall fail to remit any fee levied in this subchapter for the annual renewal of a permit within the time provided in §3-9-223, the permit shall be revoked.

(b)

If any permittee shall fail to remit the supplemental tax upon gross receipts within the time provided in §3-9-223, a penalty of twenty-five percent (25%) shall be due and payable. If such taxes plus penalty are not paid within thirty (30) days from the due date, the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division shall revoke the permit of the permittee, and the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration shall seek recovery of the amount of such taxes and penalties due from the permittee.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 132, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-1411; Acts 1999, No. 910, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 3354.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary” for “Director” in (b).

3-9-235. Suspension, cancellation, and revocation of permits.

(a)

Upon his or her own complaint or that of any law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the permitted premises, the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division may suspend, cancel, or revoke any permit granted hereunder for violation by the permittee of any provision of this subchapter or any rule, regulation, or order of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board.

(b)

Permits may be suspended, cancelled, or revoked for the following causes:

(1)

Conviction of the permittee for violating any of the provisions of this subchapter;

(2)

Willful failure or refusal by any permittee to comply with any of the provisions of this subchapter or of any rule or regulation adopted pursuant thereto;

(3)

The making of any materially false statement in any application for a permit;

(4)

The possession for sale on the permitted premises of any alcoholic beverages upon which applicable taxes have not been paid;

(5)

The willful failure of any permittee to keep any records or make any reports required by this subchapter or by any rule or regulation adopted thereunder or to allow an inspection of such records by any duly authorized person; and

(6)

The suspension or revocation of a permit issued to the permittee by the federal government or conviction of violating any federal law relating to alcoholic beverages.

(c)

No permit shall be suspended, cancelled, or revoked except after a hearing by the director with reasonable notice to the permittee and an opportunity for him or her to appear and defend as provided in §3-2-212.

(d)(1)

Appeals to the board from an order by the director of suspension, cancellation, or revocation may be had as provided by §3-2-213.

(2)

Appeals from a decision of the board may be had as provided in §3-2-216.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 132, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-1413; Acts 1999, No. 910, § 3.

Cross References.

Licenses and permits, removal of disqualification for criminal offenses, §17-1-103.

Revocation and suspension procedure generally, §§3-2-212 —3-2-217.

3-9-236. Permittees — Miscellaneous unlawful practices.

It shall be unlawful and constitute a Class A misdemeanor for any person holding a permit hereunder or his or her agents, servants, or employees knowingly to do any of the following acts:

(1)

Serve any alcoholic beverage to a person who is under twenty-one (21) years of age;

(2)

Serve any alcoholic beverage to an intoxicated person, to any person who is known to be insane or mentally defective, to any person who is known to habitually drink alcoholic beverages to excess, or to any person who is known to be an habitual user of narcotics or other habit-forming drugs;

(3)

Sell alcoholic beverages at any prohibited time;

(4)

Place any sign of any description on the exterior of the permitted premises indicating that alcoholic beverages are sold for consumption therein;

(5)

Misrepresent the brand of any alcoholic beverage sold or offered for sale;

(6)

Keep any alcoholic beverage otherwise than in the bottle or container in which it was purchased;

(7)

Refill or partly refill any bottle or container of alcoholic beverage;

(8)

Dilute or otherwise tamper with the contents of any bottle or container of alcoholic beverage;

(9)

Fail to break and destroy by the close of each business day all empty bottles or containers;

(10)

Remove or obliterate any label, mark, or stamp affixed to any bottle or container of alcoholic beverage offered for sale;

(11)

Deliver or sell the contents of any bottles or containers, the label, mark, or stamp upon which has been removed or obliterated;

(12)(A)

Employ any person less than twenty-one (21) years of age in the mixing or serving of alcoholic beverages.

(B)

Provided, that any permittee that has obtained a permit under the provisions of §3-9-202(8) or §3-9-202(16) may employ persons nineteen (19) years of age or older in the serving of alcoholic beverages.

(C)

Nothing herein shall prohibit a minor eighteen (18) years of age or older to be employed as a musician or to be employed in the preparation or serving of food or in the housekeeping department of any establishment authorized to dispense mixed drinks under this subchapter;

(13)

Allow any immoral, lewd, obscene, indecent, or profane conduct, language, literature, pictures, or materials on the permitted premises;

(14)

Consume or allow the consumption by any employee of intoxicating beverages while on duty;

(15)(A)

Keep on the permitted premises a slot machine or any gambling or gaming device, machine, or apparatus, except as provided in subdivisions (15)(B) and (C) of this section.

(B)(i)

An event held by a nonprofit organization that is exempt from taxation under 26 U.S.C. §
501(c)(3) shall be exempt from subdivision (15)(A) of this section if:

(a)

The nonprofit organization registers the event with the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division at least sixty (60) days before the event;

(b)

All proceeds of the event are for the benefit of the nonprofit organization;

(c)

The games in the event do not use money but may use some form of play money;

(d)

No cash or any other item of value is won or awarded as a prize; and

(e)

The event is for amusement and not for gambling purposes in violation of Arkansas law or Arkansas Constitution, Article 19, § 14.

(ii)

(a)

This subdivision (15)(B) shall apply to only one (1) event held by a nonprofit organization during a calendar year.

(b)

No licensed premises shall be allowed more than ten (10) events under this subdivision (15)(B) per calendar year.

(iii)

(a)

A violation of this subdivision (15)(B) by a nonprofit organization is a violation and is punishable by a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(b)

If a nonprofit organization commits a second violation of this subdivision (15)(B), the nonprofit organization shall be ineligible to sponsor an event under this subdivision (15)(B).

(iv)

The division may promulgate appropriate rules to carry out the intent of this subdivision (15)(B).

(C)

A gambling or a gaming device, machine, or apparatus under subdivision (15)(A) of this section does not include:

(i)

Charitable bingo and raffles under the Charitable Bingo and Raffles Enabling Act, §23-114-101 et seq.; or

(ii)

A lottery under the Arkansas Scholarship Lottery Act, §23-115-101 et seq.;

(16)

Sell any alcoholic beverage unless the beverage is owned outright by the permittee;

(17)(A)

Employ a person to serve an alcoholic beverage who has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to or has been found guilty of:

(i)

A violation of a law concerning possession, sale, manufacture, or transportation of intoxicating liquor; or

(ii)

A felony and is on probation or serving a suspended sentence as a result of the felony, except as provided under subdivisions (17)(B) and (C) of this section.

(B)

A person who has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to or has been found guilty of a felony and who is on probation or serving a suspended sentence as a result of the felony may be employed by an on-premise permittee if:

(i)

The person works only in a kitchen; and

(ii)

Alcoholic beverages are not served out of the kitchen.

(C)

A person who has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to or has been found guilty of a felony and who is not on probation or serving a suspended sentence as a result of the felony may be employed by an on-premise permittee in any capacity;

(18)

Violate any rule, regulation, or order of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board;

(19)

Fail to report all taxes applicable to the sale of alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption; or

(20)

Possess on the permitted premises or sell or dispense any alcoholic beverages upon which the federal or state taxes have not been paid.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 132, § 14; 1971, No. 467, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-1414; Acts 2003, No. 1807, § 2; 2005, No. 1170, § 1; 2005, No. 1994, § 195; 2009, No. 605, § 12; 2009, No. 606, § 12; 2013, No. 527, § 5[6].

Amendments.

The 2003 amendment redesignated former (12) as present (12)(A) and (12)(C), and inserted (12)(B).

The 2005 amendment by No. 1170 redesignated former (15) as present (15)(A); inserted “except as provided in subdivision (15)(B) of this section” in present (15)(A); and added (15)(B)-(E).

The 2005 amendment by No. 1994 inserted “Class A” in the introductory language.

The 2009 amendment by identical acts Nos. 605 and 606 substituted “subdivisions (15)(B)-(C)” for “subdivision (15)(B)” in (15)(A); redesignated (15)(B); substituted “this subdivision (15)(B)” for “this section” or “this subdivision” throughout (15)(B); redesignated former (15)(C)-(E); substituted “by a nonprofit organization is a violation” for “is a misdemeanor” in (15)(B)(iii)

(a)

; and inserted (15)(C).

The 2013 amendment rewrote (17).

3-9-237. Disposition of funds.

All permit fees and supplemental gross receipts taxes collected for the state pursuant to this subchapter shall be remitted monthly to the Treasurer of State as general revenues and be credited to the State Apportionment Fund. There the fees and taxes shall be allocated and transferred to the various funds, fund accounts, and accounts participating in general revenues in the respective proportions to each as provided by, and shall be used for the respective purposes set forth in, the Revenue Stabilization Law, §19-5-101 et seq.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 4, § 5; 1953, No. 118, § 36(E); 1969, No. 132, § 18, as amended by Acts 1953, No. 118, § 36 as added by 1971, No. 585, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-1418.

3-9-238. Pari-mutuel mixed drink permit.

(a)(1)

There is hereby created a pari-mutuel mixed drink permit which is to be issued for any restaurant, as defined by §3-9-202, in any county where pari-mutuel wagering has been authorized by law.

(2)

The permits may be issued only in cities of the first class in which the sale of alcoholic beverages is authorized by law.

(b)

The permit fees and qualifications for the permits are the same as those currently provided for restaurants as set out in §3-9-202. However, the seating capacity of these restaurants must be at least one hundred (100) seats.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1288, § 1; 2001, No. 804, § 1.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1995, No. 1288 became law without the Governor's signature.

3-9-239. Small restaurant permit.

(a)

A restaurant that purchases five hundred sixty liters (560 l) of spirituous liquors or less from an entity holding a wholesale liquor permit may apply to the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division for a small restaurant permit.

(b)(1)

If the small restaurant permit holder purchases more than five hundred sixty liters (560 l) of spirituous liquors in a fiscal year, the small restaurant permit holder shall apply for a permit under §3-9-212.

(2)

A small restaurant permit holder shall pay the difference between the small restaurant permit fee and the permit fee authorized under §3-9-212 for the current fiscal year.

(3)

The small restaurant permit holder shall submit documentation from the wholesalers itemizing the amount of spirituous liquors purchased from each wholesaler.

(c)

The annual fee for the small restaurant permit is three hundred dollars ($300) per fiscal year.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 763, § 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2009, No. 763, § 2, assigned this section as §3-4-608. However, pursuant to §1-2-303, the Arkansas Code Revision Commission reassigned Acts 2009, No. 763, § 2, to §3-9-239.